Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2649.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Certain Fertility Preservation Services.--(a) An insurer that offers, issues or renews a 12345678910111213141516171819 health insurance policy in this Commonwealth shall include fertility preservation services as a covered benefit for a covered person if a medically necessary treatment may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic infertility in the covered person. The following shall apply to coverage under this section:(1) Coverage under this section shall include storage for not less than three years at an in-network facility.(2) If an insurer does not have an in-network facility available for storage or an in-network facility becomes unavailable during the period specified under clause (1), the in-network requirement under clause (1) shall not apply to storage.(3) An insurer may impose a lifetime maximum benefit for coverage under this section if the lifetime maximum benefit is not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each covered person.(4) An insurer may limit coverage under this section to a period that ends on the earlier of the following:(i) Three years after the date of the medically necessary treatment that may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic infertility in the covered person.(ii) The date on which the covered person is no longer covered under the health insurance policy.(5) Coverage under this section shall be subject to all of the following:(i) Article XXI.(ii) The terms and conditions of the health insurance policy, including determinations of medical necessity and clinical review criteria used for utilization review of health 20260HB2649PN3753 - 2 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care services, copayment provisions, deductible provisions and coinsurance provisions.(6) Coverage under this section shall be administered in a similar manner to other health care services provided under the terms and conditions of the health insurance policy.(b) A religious employer may submit a written request to an insurer for an exemption from the coverage required under subsection (a). The insurer shall grant the exemption if the coverage conflicts with the religious employer's bona fide religious beliefs and practices.(c) A religious employer that obtains an exemption under subsection (b) shall provide written notice of the exemption to each prospective enrollee covered under the health insurance policy.(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an enrollee covered under a health insurance policy provided by a religious employer from purchasing, at the enrollee's own expense, a supplemental insurance policy that covers fertility preservation services.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Fertility preservation service" means a procedure or service to preserve fertility in accordance with nationally recognized clinical or professional guidelines existing on the effective date of this section. The term includes egg retrieval, sperm retrieval, ovarian tissue retrieval and cryopreservation."Health care service" means a treatment, admission, procedure, medical supply, medical equipment or other service, including behavioral health, ordered or otherwise provided or 20260HB2649PN3753 - 3 - ◄◄◄◄◄◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proposed to be provided by a health care provider to a patient for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health condition, illness, injury or disease."Health insurance policy" means an individual or group insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A fixed indemnity policy.(7) A hospital indemnity policy.(8) A dental only policy.(9) A vision only policy.(10) A worker's compensation policy.(11) An automobile medical payment policy.(12) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(13) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Iatrogenic infertility" means an impairment of fertility caused directly or indirectly by a medically necessary treatment for cancer . The term includes an impairment of fertility caused directly or indirectly by surgery, chemotherapy, radiation or another medical treatment with a potential side effect of impaired fertility. , INCLUDING SURGERY, CHEMOTHERAPY, RADIATION 20260HB2649PN3753 - 4 - ◄◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OR ANOTHER MEDICAL TREATMENT FOR CANCER WITH A POTENTIAL SIDE EFFECT OF IMPAIRED FERTILITY."Insurer" means an entity licensed by the Insurance Department with accident and health authority to issue a health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Religious employer" means an employer that is a church, convention or association of churches or an elementary or secondary school that is controlled, operated or principally supported by a church as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 3121(w)(3)(A) (relating to definitions) and qualifies as a tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.).Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For a health insurance policy for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to a policy issued or 20260HB2649PN3753 - 5 - ◄123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2649PN3753 - 6 - ◄123